Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-420
Court-martial; who may convene.

A court-martial may be convened by:

(1) The Governor of Nebraska; or

(2) Any other commanding officer in any of the military forces who is of the rank of major or above.

If any such officer is an accuser, the court shall be convened by superior competent authority, and may in any case be convened by such authority if considered advisable by him.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 20, p. 1562.